Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-215
School lands; acquisition by city or village; when authorized; limitations.

Any city or village may acquire such educational lands not exceeding forty acres for solid waste disposal areas, sewage disposal purposes, necessary right-of-way for electric transmission lines, or for any other purpose, except park and recreational purposes, for which a city or village may condemn private lands.

Laws 1929, c. 188, § 1, p. 652;

C.S.1929, § 72-211;

Laws 1931, c. 118, § 1, p. 345;

Laws 1935, c. 164, § 1, p. 611;

Laws 1941, c. 145, § 1, p. 576;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 72-211;

Laws 1943, c. 160, § 1, p. 573;

R.S.1943, § 72-215;

Laws 1963, c. 415, § 1, p. 1337;

Laws 1969, c. 590, § 1, p. 2441;

Laws 1983, LB 29, § 1.